Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-302
Domestic corporations; biennial report;
contents.

The biennial report required under section 21-301
from a domestic corporation shall show:

(1) The exact corporate name of the corporation;

(2) The street address of the corporation's registered office and the
name of its current registered agent at that office in this state. A post
office box number may be provided in addition to the street address;

(3) The street address of the corporation's principal office;

(4) The names and street addresses of the corporation's directors and
principal officers, which shall include the president, secretary, and treasurer;

(5) A brief description of the nature of the corporation's business;

(6) The amount of paid-up capital stock; and

(7) The change or changes, if any, in the above particulars made since
the last biennial report.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 2, p. 745;

R.S.1913, § 762;

C.S.1922, § 680;

C.S.1929, § 24-1702;

R.S.1943, § 21-302;

Laws 1967, c. 101, § 2, p. 309;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 195;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB379, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 239.